Hawaii statutes.
PART IV.
ADMISSION TO PSYCHIATRIC FACILITY

Law Journals and Reviews

Risky Business: Assessing Dangerousness in Hawai‘i. 24 UH
L. Rev. 63.

§§334-51 to 58 [OLD] REPEALED. L 1976,
c 130, pt of §4.

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next